California, session 20252026, AB1484.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 345 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:345. (a) The Independent System Operator shall ensure the efficient use and reliable operation of the transmission grid grid, consistent with the achievement of planning and operating reserve criteria that are no less stringent than those established by the Western Electricity Coordinating Council and the North American Electric Reliability Council.(b) In furtherance of subdivision (a), the Independent System Operator may amend its tariff, as deemed necessary and subject to approval by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission through its rulemaking process, to be consistent with subdivision (a).